District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-2109

Gifts to Hospital — Authorization to accept.

Repealed.

History

Nov. 7, 1941, 55 Stat. 760, ch. 469, § 1
Reorg. Plan No. 1 (1953), 67 Stat. 631, 18 F.R. 2053, § 5
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(j)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-609.
1973 Ed., § 32-408.

Effective Dates

Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.